Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.160

Use of tax revenue for bond repayment. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under RCW 39.102.150 to finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds all or part of any local excise tax allocation revenues and all or part of any local property tax allocation revenues dedicated by the sponsoring local government, any participating local government, or participating taxing district. The sponsoring local government may also pledge all or part of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 and held in connection with the public improvements. All of such tax revenues are subject to the use restrictions in RCW 39.102.040 through 39.102.070, and the process requirements in RCW 39.102.080(1).

[ 2006 c 181 s 502.]